Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3320.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 20 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the figure “$50” in line 128 the following:-
“ ; provided, however, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
punishment of any person who operates or permits a motor vehicle owned by him to be operated
without a certificate of inspection shall not be classified as a surchargeable incident and shall not
result in an increase in an operator's insurance premium by the motor vehicle insurance merit
rating board.”
SECTION 2. Nothing in this act shall prevent the issuance of a $50 fine for violating the
“INSPECTION STICKER NOT DISPLAYED” citable motor vehicle offense as listed in the
Table of Citable Motor Vehicle Offenses issued on January 14, 2022, by the registry of motor
vehicles and district court department of the trial court.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1